Utah statutes.
63G-8-201.   Voluntary services -- Immunity from liability -- Exceptions.

Any person performing services on a voluntary basis, without compensation, under the general supervision of, and on behalf of any public entity, shall be immune from liability with respect to any decisions or actions, other than in connection with the operation of a motor vehicle, taken during the course of those services, unless it is established that such decisions or actions were grossly negligent, not made in good faith, or were made maliciously.

